Utah statutes.
32A-5-101.   Commission's power to license clubs -- Limitations.
(1)  As used in this chapter:
(a)  "Club license" means a license granted under this chapter.
(b)  "Club licensee" means a person granted a club license under this chapter.
(c)  "Dining club licensee" means a person who qualifies as a club licensee
under Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(C).
(d)  "Equity club licensee" means a person who qualifies as a club licensee
under Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(A).
(e)  "Fraternal club licensee" means a person who qualifies as a club licensee
under Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(B).
(f)  "Social club licensee" means a person who qualifies as a club licensee
under Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(D).
(2)  Before a person may sell or allow the consumption of an alcoholic
beverage on its premises as a club licensee, the person shall first obtain a
license from the commission as provided in this chapter.
(3) (a)  The commission may grant a club license to a person that:
(i)  meets the requirements of this chapter; and
(ii) (A)  for an equity club licensee, meets the following requirements:
(I)  whether incorporated or unincorporated:
(Aa)  is organized and operated solely for a social, recreational, patriotic,
or fraternal purpose;
(Bb)  has members;
(Cc)  limits access to its premises to a member or a guest of the member; and
(Dd)  desires to maintain premises upon which an alcoholic beverage may be
stored, sold to, served to, and consumed by a member or a guest of a member;
(II)  owns, maintains, or operates a substantial recreational facility in
conjunction with a club house such as:
(Aa)  a golf course; or
(Bb)  a tennis facility;
(III)  has at least 50% of the total membership having:
(Aa)  full voting rights; and
(Bb)  an equal share of the equity of the club; and
(IV)  if there is more than one class of membership, has at least one class of
membership that entitles each member in that class to:
(Aa)  full voting rights; and
(Bb)  an equal share of the equity of the club;
(B)  for a fraternal club licensee, meets the following requirements:
(I)  whether incorporated or unincorporated:
(Aa)  is organized and operated solely for a social, recreational, patriotic,
or fraternal purpose;
(Bb)  has members;
(Cc)  limits access to its premises to a member or a guest of the member; and
(Dd)  desires to maintain premises upon which an alcoholic beverage may be
stored, sold to, served to, and consumed by a member or a guest of a member;
(II)  has no capital stock;
(III)  exists solely for:
(Aa)  the benefit of its members and their beneficiaries; and
(Bb) a lawful social, intellectual, educational, charitable, benevolent,
moral, fraternal, patriotic, or religious purpose for the benefit of its
members or the public, carried on through voluntary activity of its members in
their local lodges;
(IV)  has a representative form of government; and
(V)  has a lodge system in which:
(Aa)  there is a supreme governing body;
(Bb)  subordinate to the supreme governing body are local lodges, however
designated, into which individuals are admitted as members in accordance with
the laws of the fraternal;
(Cc)  the local lodges are required by the laws of the fraternal to hold
regular meetings at least monthly;
(Dd)  the local lodges regularly engage in one or more programs involving
member participation to implement the purposes of Subsection
(3)(a)(ii)(B)(III); and
(Ee)  owns or leases a building or space in a building used for lodge
activities;
(C)  for a dining club licensee, meets the following requirements:
(I)  is determined by the commission to be a dining club licensee, as part of
which the commission may consider:
(Aa)  the square footage and seating capacity of an applicant;
(Bb)  what portion of the square footage and seating capacity will be used for
a dining area in comparison to the portion that will be used as a bar area;
(Cc)  whether full meals including appetizers, main courses, and desserts are
served;
(Dd)  whether the applicant will maintain adequate on-premise culinary
facilities to prepare full meals, except an applicant that is located on the
premise of a hotel or resort facility may use the culinary facilities of the
hotel or resort facility;
(Ee)  whether the entertainment provided at the club is suitable for minors;
and
(Ff)  the club management's ability to manage and operate a dining club
license including management experience, past dining club licensee or
restaurant management experience, and the type of management scheme employed
by the dining club license; and
(II)  maintains at least 50% of its total club business from the sale of food,
not including:
(Aa)  mix for alcoholic beverages; or
(Bb)  service charges; or
(D)  for a social club licensee:
(I)  does not meet the requirements of a license under Subsections
(3)(a)(ii)(A) through (C); or
(II)  seeks to qualify as a social club licensee.
(b)  At the time that the commission grants a club license, the commission
shall designate the type of club license for which the person qualifies.
(4) (a)  A club licensee or an officer, director, managing agent, or employee
of a club licensee may not store, sell, serve, or permit consumption of an
alcoholic beverage upon the premises of the club licensee, under a permit
issued by local authority or otherwise, unless a club license is first granted
by the commission.
(b)  Violation of this Subsection (4) is a class B misdemeanor.
(5) (a)  Subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (5) and Subsection
32A-4a-201(2), the commission may grant club licenses at places and in numbers
as the commission considers necessary.
(b)  The total number of club licenses may not at any time aggregate more than
that number determined by dividing the population of the state by 7,850.
(c)  For purposes of this Subsection (5), population shall be determined by:
(i)  the most recent United States decennial or special census; or
(ii) another population determination made by the United States or state
governments.
(d) (i)  The commission may issue seasonal club licenses to be established in
areas the commission considers necessary to:
(A)  a dining club licensee; or
(B)  a social club licensee.
(ii)  A seasonal club license shall be for a period of six consecutive months.
(iii)  A club license issued for operation during a summer time period is
known as a "Seasonal A" club license.  The period of operation for a "Seasonal
A" club license shall:
(A)  begin on May 1; and
(B)  end on October 31.
(iv)  A club license issued for operation during a winter time period is known
as a "Seasonal B" club license.  The period of operation for a "Seasonal B"
club license shall:
(A)  begin on November 1; and
(B)  end on April 30.
(v)  In determining the number of club licenses that the commission may issue
under this section:
(A)  a seasonal club license is counted as one-half of one club license; and
(B)  each "Seasonal A" club license shall be paired with a "Seasonal B" club
license.
(e) (i)  If the location, design, and construction of a hotel may require more
than one club license location within the hotel to serve the public
convenience, the commission may authorize as many as three club license
locations within the hotel under one club license if:
(A)  the hotel has a minimum of 150 guest rooms; and
(B)  all locations under the club license are:
(I)  within the same hotel facility; and
(II)  on premises that are:
(Aa)  managed or operated by the club licensee; and
(Bb)  owned or leased by the club licensee.
(ii) A facility other than a hotel may not have more than one club license
location under a single club license.
(6) (a) Except as provided in Subsection (6)(b), (c), or (d), the premises of
a club license may not be established:
(i)  within 600 feet of a community location, as measured by the method in
Subsection (6)(e); or
(ii)  within 200 feet of a community location, measured in a straight line
from the nearest entrance of the proposed outlet to the nearest property
boundary of the community location.
(b)  With respect to the establishment of a club license, the commission may
authorize a variance to reduce the proximity requirement of Subsection
(6)(a)(i) if:
(i)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(ii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a club
license in the community are limited;
(iii)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(iv)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances
and the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the club license would not be detrimental to the
public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community; and
(v) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the
club licensee is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (6)(b)(v)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of a club licensee; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the club licensee is to be
located for establishing a club license to satisfy the unmet demand described
in Subsection (6)(b)(v)(B)(I).
(c)  With respect to the establishment of a club license, the commission may
authorize a variance that reduces the proximity requirement of Subsection
(6)(a)(ii) if:
(i)  the community location at issue is:
(A)  a public library; or
(B)  a public park;
(ii)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(iii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a club
license in the community are limited;
(iv)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(v)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances and
the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the club license would not be detrimental to the
public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community; and
(vi) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the
club licensee is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (6)(c)(vi)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of a club license; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the club licensee is to be
located for establishing a club license to satisfy the unmet demand described
in Subsection (6)(c)(vi)(B)(I).
(d)  With respect to the premises of a club license issued by the commission
that undergoes a change of ownership, the commission may waive or vary the
proximity requirements of Subsection (6)(a) in considering whether to grant a
club license to the new owner of the premises if:
(i) (A)  the premises previously received a variance reducing the proximity
requirement of Subsection (6)(a)(i); or
(B)  the premises received a variance reducing the proximity requirement of
Subsection (6)(a)(ii) on or before May 4, 2008; or
(ii)  a variance from proximity requirements was otherwise allowed under this
title.
(e)  The 600 foot limitation described in Subsection (6)(a)(i) is measured
from the nearest entrance of the outlet by following the shortest route of
ordinary pedestrian travel to the property boundary of the community location.
(7) (a)  Nothing in this section prevents the commission from considering the
proximity of any educational, religious, and recreational facility, or any
other relevant factor in reaching a decision on whether to issue a club
license.
(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (7), "educational facility" includes:
(i)  a nursery school;
(ii)  infant day care center; and
(iii)  a trade and technical school.
(8)  If requested by a club licensee, the commission may approve a change in
the type of club license in accordance with rules made by the commission.
(9)  To the extent not prohibited by law other than this chapter, this chapter
does not prevent a dining club licensee or social club licensee from
restricting access to the club license premises on the basis of an individual:
(a)  paying a fee; or
(b)  agreeing to being on a list of individuals who have access to the club
license premises.
